South Dakota, session 2026, SB154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 10-13-39 be AMENDED:
10-13-39. Each owner-occupied single-family dwelling in this state is specifically
classified for the purpose of taxation. For the purposes of this section, an owner-occupied
single-family dwelling is a house, condominium apartment, residential housing consisting
of four or less family units, town house, town home, housing cooperatives where
membership in the cooperative is strictly limited to stockholder occupants of the building,
dwelling as classified in § 10-13-39.1, and manufactured or mobile home as defined in
§ 32-3-1, which is assessed and taxed as a separate unit. An owner-occupied single-family
dwelling includes all garages and ancillary structures related to the residential use of the
dwelling by the owner, and the parcels of land upon which the garages or structures are
situated, as recorded in the records of the director of equalization.
A person may only have one dwelling, which is the person's principal place of
residence as defined in § 12-1-4, classified as an owner-occupied single-family dwelling.
If the owner occupies fifty percent or more of the living space within the dwelling, the
entire dwelling is classified as an owner-occupied single-family dwelling. If the owner
occupies a duplex, triplex, or fourplex, or less than fifty percent of the living space within
the dwelling, the portion of the dwelling so occupied must be classified as an owner-
occupied single-family dwelling.
Section 2. That § 10-13-45 be AMENDED:
10-13-45. Any contractor that has constructed or is constructing a single-family
dwelling, as defined in § 10-13-39, for the purpose of selling the dwelling to be occupied
as a single-family dwelling may apply to have the property specifically classified for the

26.907.19 2 154
purpose of taxation pursuant to §§ 10-13-39 to 10-13-40.3, inclusive, as an owner-
occupied single-family dwelling.
A contractor may only have a maximum of four dwellings classified as owner-
occupied single-family dwellings. If any portion of the space is or has been occupied, only
the portion of the dwelling not currently or previously occupied shall be classified as an
owner-occupied single-family dwelling. The contractor shall comply with the application
provisions imposed on the owner-occupant pursuant to §§ 10-13-39 to 10-13-40.3,
inclusive. No dwelling, pursuant to this section, may be classified as an owner-occupied
single-family dwelling for more than two consecutive years.
SB154 ENROLLED

26.907.19 3 154
An Act to clarify the eligibility of multiple garages or structures to be classified as owner-
occupied.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 154
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 154 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB154 ENROLLED